src/fst/mansi-lexicon.lexc
! To COMPILE this file with HFST using: in the SHELL buffer

! hfst-compile.sh: combines the following three commands:
!   hfst-lexc -v -f foma mansi-lexicon.lexc -o mansi-lexicon.inverted.hfst
!   hfst-invert -v mansi-lexicon.inverted.hfst -o mansi-lexicon.debug.hfst
!   hfst-fst2fst -v mansi-lexicon.debug.hfst -f olw -o mansi-lexicon.hfst

! To RUN:
!   hfst-lookup mansi-lexicon.hfst

!!! ! Compile this file with xfst using:
!!! ! lexc
!!! ! compile-source
!!! ! source-to-result
!!! ! save-result finntreebank.xfst
!!! ! Compile this file with foma using:
!!! ! foma
!!! ! read lexc finntreebank.lexc
!!! ! save stack finntreebank.foma

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Multichar_Symbols

%+

!!! use this for macron over VOWELS: (772  ̄ #\COMBINING_MACRON)
!!! not this one, it is too big: (773 ̅ #\COMBINING_OVERLINE)

!!! (256 Ā #\LATIN_CAPITAL_LETTER_A_WITH_MACRON)
!!! (257 ā #\LATIN_SMALL_LETTER_A_WITH_MACRON)
!!! 
!!! (274 Ē #\LATIN_CAPITAL_LETTER_E_WITH_MACRON)
!!! (275 ē #\LATIN_SMALL_LETTER_E_WITH_MACRON)
!!! 
!!! (332 Ō #\LATIN_CAPITAL_LETTER_O_WITH_MACRON)
!!! (333 ō #\LATIN_SMALL_LETTER_O_WITH_MACRON)
!!! 
!!! !! NB: we don't want to use these two, since we have better cyrillic codes:
!!! (562 Ȳ #\LATIN_CAPITAL_LETTER_Y_WITH_MACRON)
!!! (563 ȳ #\LATIN_SMALL_LETTER_Y_WITH_MACRON)
!!! 
!!! (1250 Ӣ #\CYRILLIC_CAPITAL_LETTER_I_WITH_MACRON)
!!! (1251 ӣ #\CYRILLIC_SMALL_LETTER_I_WITH_MACRON)
!!! 
!!! (1262 Ӯ #\CYRILLIC_CAPITAL_LETTER_U_WITH_MACRON)
!!! (1263 ӯ #\CYRILLIC_SMALL_LETTER_U_WITH_MACRON)
!!! 
!!! don't ask me why, but of all the cyrillic characters, there are only two
!!! with macron...
!!! 
!!! the only other non-standard cyrillic character used in Mansi is:
!!! 
!!! (1223 Ӈ #\CYRILLIC_CAPITAL_LETTER_EN_WITH_HOOK)
!!! (1224 ӈ #\CYRILLIC_SMALL_LETTER_EN_WITH_HOOK)

! Finug  !!! L-S !!! Notes:
ā        !!!    !!! 257 ā #\LATIN_SMALL_LETTER_A_WITH_MACRON 
ē        !!! 
ё̄        !!! 
ӣ        !!! йӣквыт
ō        !!!    !!! (333 ō #\LATIN_SMALL_LETTER_O_WITH_MACRON)
ӯ        !!! ӯ  !!! (1263 ӯ #\CYRILLIC_SMALL_LETTER_U_WITH_MACRON)
ы̄        !!! ??? http://www.nba.fi/hanti/mn/intro1.php
э̄        !!! 
ю̄        !!! 
я̄        !!! 
      
Ы        !!! syncopating vowel symbol


!!! 
!!! ! Use bracketed multichars like <X%> to get output " X" in hfst-proc --cg!!!
!!! 
!!! %<A%>
%<N%>
%<V%>
!!! %<Adp%> %<Prep%> %<Postp%>
!!! %<Adv%>
!!! %<Abbr%> %<Interj%>
!!! %<Pron%>
!!! %<CC%> %<CS%>
!!! %<Punct%> %<Char%>
!!! 
!!! %<dem%> %<indef%>
!!! 
%<sg%> %<pl%>
%<nom%> %<gen%> %<par%> %<acc%>
!!! %<ine%> %<ela%> %<ill%>
%<ade%> %<abl%> %<all%>
!!! %<abe%> %<ins%> %<ess%> %<cmt%> %<tra%>
!!! 
!!! %<pxsg1%> %<pxsg2%> %<pxsg3%>
!!! %<pxpl1%> %<pxpl2%> %<pxpl3%>
!!! 
!!! %<sg1%> %<sg2%> %<sg3%>
!!! %<pl1%> %<pl2%> %<pl3%>
!!! %<pe4%>
!!! %<act%> %<pss%>
!!! %<indv%> %<cond%> %<impv%> %<potn%>
!!! %<pres%> %<past%>
!!! %<a%> %<e%> %<ma%> 
!!! %<pcpnut%> %<pcpma%> %<pcpva%>
!!! %<neg%> %<conneg%>
!!! %<sup%> %<cmp%>
!!! %<han%> %<ko%> %<pa%> %<s%> %<kaan%> %<ka%> %<kin%>
!!! %<sent%>
!!! %<dash%> %<bracket%-open%> %<bracket%-close%>
!!! %<%?%>


LEXICON Root
!!! 0   Abbreviations   ;
!!! 0   Acronyms    ;
!!! 0   Adjectives  ;
!!! 0   Adpositions ;
!!! 0   Adverbs ;
!!! 0   Conjunctions    ;
!!! 0   DeverbalNouns   ;
!!! 0   Interjections   ;
0   Nouns-StemC    ;
0   Nouns-StemCC    ;
0   Nouns-StemV1   ;
0   Nouns-StemV2   ; 
!!! 0   Numerals    ;
!!! 0   Particles   ;
!!! 0   Prefixes    ;
!!! 0   Pronouns    ;
!!! 0   Symbols ;
0   Verbs   ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Nouns-StemC

!-  Ngrandson:апыг      NounNumber-StemC ;
!-  Ngaff:вāӈкрип       NounNumber-StemC ;
!-  Nbear:вōртōлнут     NounNumber-StemC ;
!-  Nsaddle:инар        NounNumber-StemC ;
!-  Ntree:йӣв           NounNumber-StemC ;
!-  Ntrap:каскан        NounNumber-StemC ;
!-  Nhand:кāт           NounNumber-StemC ;
!-  Nrope:квāлыг        NounNumber-StemC ;
!-  Nword:лāтЫӈ         NounNumber-StemC ;  !!syncopating!
!-  Nmushroom:лāхЫс     NounNumber-StemC ;  !!syncopating!
!-  Nbay:лōх            NounNumber-StemC ;
!-  Nhorse:лув          NounNumber-StemC ;
!-  Nboat:хāп           NounNumber-StemC ;

апыг:апыг             NounNumber-StemC	"grandson" ;
вāӈкрип:вāӈкрип       NounNumber-StemC	"gaff" ;
вōртōлнут:вōртōлнут   NounNumber-StemC	"bear" ;
инар:инар             NounNumber-StemC	"saddle" ;
йӣв:йӣв               NounNumber-StemC	"tree" ;
каскан:каскан         NounNumber-StemC	"trap" ;
кāт:кāт               NounNumber-StemC	"hand" ;
квāлыг:квāлыг         NounNumber-StemC	"rope" ;

лāтыӈ:лāты2ӈ          NounNumber-StemC	"word" ;  !!syncopating!
лāхыс:лāхы2с          NounNumber-StemC	"mushroom" ;  !!syncopating!

лōх:лōх               NounNumber-StemC	"bay" ;
лув:лув               NounNumber-StemC	"horse" ;
хāп:хāп               NounNumber-StemC	"boat" ;
паль                  NounNumber-StemC  "(eng) ear/ (hun) fül/(rus) ухо" ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON NounNumber-StemC

%<N%>%<sg%>:0        NounCase-StemC ;
%<N%>%<du%>:ыг       NounCase-StemC ;
%<N%>%<pl%>:ыт       NounCase-StemC ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON NounCase-StemC

%<nom%>:0        # ;
%<lat%>:н        # ;
%<loc%>:т        # ;
%<abl%>:ныл      # ;
%<instr%>:ыл     # ;
%<tran%>:ыг      # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Nouns-StemCC

пāрт:пāрт          NounNumber-StemCC	"board" ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON NounNumber-StemCC

%<N%>%<sg%>:0        NounCase-StemCC ;
%<N%>%<du%>:ыг       NounCase-StemC  ;
%<N%>%<pl%>:ыт       NounCase-StemC  ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON NounCase-StemCC

%<nom%>:0        # ;
%<lat%>:ын       # ;
%<loc%>:ыт       # ;
%<abl%>:ныл      # ;
%<instr%>:ыл     # ;
%<tran%>:ыг      # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Nouns-StemV1

ёса:ёса           NounNumber-StemV1	"ski" ;
лӯпта:лӯпта       NounNumber-StemV1	"leaf" ;
ōвта:ōвта         NounNumber-StemV1	"sting" ;
ōйка:ōйка         NounNumber-StemV1	"man" ;
сира:сира         NounNumber-StemV1	"seagull" ;
ӯра:ӯра           NounNumber-StemV1	"warehouse" ;
хура:хура         NounNumber-StemV1	"trough" ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON NounNumber-StemV1

%<N%>%<sg%>:0        NounCase-StemV1 ;
%<N%>%<du%>:г        NounCase-StemC  ;
%<N%>%<pl%>:т        NounCase-StemC  ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON NounCase-StemV1

%<nom%>:0       # ;
%<lat%>:н       # ;
%<loc%>:т       # ;
%<abl%>:ныл     # ;
%<instr%>:л     # ;
%<tran%>:г      # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Nouns-StemV2

āви:āви            NounNumber-StemV2	"door" ;
лӯлы:лӯлы          NounNumber-StemV2	"razorbill" ;
сāлы:сāлы          NounNumber-StemV2	"reindeer" ;
сымри:сымри        NounNumber-StemV2	"perch(fish)" ;
тэ̄рпи:тэ̄рпи        NounNumber-StemV2	"medicine" ;
ӯсхулы:ӯсхулы      NounNumber-StemV2	"street" ;
хури:хури          NounNumber-StemV2	"image" ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON NounNumber-StemV2

%<N%>%<sg%>:0        NounCase-StemV2 ;
%<N%>%<du%>:йыг      NounCase-StemC  ;
%<N%>%<pl%>:т        NounCase-StemC  ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON NounCase-StemV2

%<nom%>:0       # ;
%<lat%>:н       # ;
%<loc%>:т       # ;
%<abl%>:ныл     # ;
%<instr%>:л     # ;
%<tran%>:йыг    # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Verbs

мин:мин           VerbTensePers	"go" ;
ловиньт:ловиньт   VerbTensePers	"read" ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON VerbTensePers

%<V%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<1per%>:егым # ;
%<V%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<2per%>:егын # ;
%<V%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<3per%>:и # ;

%<V%>%<pres%>%<du%>%<1per%>:имен # ;
%<V%>%<pres%>%<du%>%<2per%>:егын # ;
%<V%>%<pres%>%<du%>%<3per%>:ег # ;

%<V%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<1per%>:ев # ; 
%<V%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<2per%>:егын # ;
%<V%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<3per%>:егыт # ;
